Washington statutes.
RCW 33.46.040

Appeal from denial of application.

If the application is denied by the director of financial institutions, the bank, acting by a two-thirds majority of its trustees or directors, may, within thirty days after receiving notice of such denial, appeal to the superior court of Thurston county pursuant to the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1994 c 92 s 473; 1982 c 3 s 83; 1975 1st ex.s. c 83 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.